Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB529.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Emergency Medical Services Certification Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A Commonwealth resident who has submitted an application for a reimbursement payment under the program."Bureau." The Bureau of Emergency Medical Services within the department."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718 "Program." The Emergency Medical Services Certification Program established under section 3.Section 3. Emergency Medical Services Certification Program.(a) Establishment.--The Emergency Medical Services Certification Program is established in the bureau as a Statewide program.(b) Purpose of program.--The program shall receive applications and award reimbursement payments to applicants who successfully attain any of the following certifications after the effective date of this subsection:(1) Emergency medical responder.(2) Emergency medical technician.(3) Advanced emergency medical technician.(4) Paramedic.(c) Application.--The bureau shall develop an application for an applicant to apply for a reimbursement payment within 30 days of the applicant successfully completing a certification listed in subsection (b). The application shall be made available and posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall be in a form that may be completed electronically or through the United States mail.(d) Guidelines.--The bureau shall establish guidelines that are consistent with the provisions of this section within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection. The guidelines shall be:(1) Transmitted as a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Posted on the bureau's publicly accessible Internet website.20250SB0529PN0502 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Program requirements.--An applicant may be eligible for a reimbursement payment under this section provided that the applicant submits the following to the department:(1) Within 30 days of completion, proof of successful emergency medical services certification.(2) A copy of the invoice, receipt or proof of payment to an emergency medical services education institution located in this Commonwealth.(3) The application form developed under subsection (c).(f) Reimbursement limit.--The bureau may award a reimbursement payment to an applicant not to exceed the applicant's cost of certification.(g) Award.--The bureau shall award reimbursement payments under this section no later than two months after the receipt of a completed application. The bureau shall ensure that reimbursement payments are made available to all geographic areas of this Commonwealth.(h) Ineligibility.--An applicant who has already received a reimbursement payment for certification under this section shall be ineligible to participate in the program again.(i) Residency requirement and effect of noncompliance.--The applicant agrees to the following as conditions of acceptance of a reimbursement payment:(1) The applicant must maintain residency in this Commonwealth for a period of two years after the date of the individual's certification.(2) The applicant has a duty to notify the department of a change of the individual's residency during the two-year period.(3) If the applicant fails to do so, the applicant will 20250SB0529PN0502 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reimburse the department for the amount of the payment upon request of the department.(j) Enforcement.--The department shall enforce this section, including bringing an action in an appropriate court to obtain reimbursement from an applicant that fails to comply with the conditions specified in subsection (i).Section 4. Appropriation.The sum of $3,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the department for the purpose of making payments under this act.Section 5. Expiration.This act shall expire on the date that the money allocated to the bureau under section 4 is fully expended. Within 60 days of that date, the department shall transmit notice of that date to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0529PN0502 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819